California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(A) Five of the directors appointed by the Governor shall be knowledgeable in the production, processing, or marketing of agricultural products and may be appointed from lists of nominees submitted for consideration to the Governor from California agricultural organizations, district agricultural associations, and county and citrus fruit fairs.

(B) One of the directors appointed by the Governor shall be a public member.

(C) Three of the directors appointed by the Governor shall be representative, to the extent possible, of areas of knowledge, interest, and expertise enumerated in
 this paragraph.

(2) One director shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one director shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. These persons shall be representative, to the extent possible, of areas of knowledge, interest, and expertise enumerated in paragraph (1).

(b) Except for directors appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, the directors shall be appointed for four-year terms. The appointing authority shall appoint directors to fill vacancies which occur during a term, and
 except for directors appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, the appointments shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. Of the four vacancies that will occur on December 31, 1986, two of the vacancies shall be filled by persons appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 43, Sec. 2.   (AB 1831)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3313.

The board may annually select a chairperson from among the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

3314.

The directors shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

3315.

Any director who misses three consecutive regular meetings of the board without permission of the board shall be deemed to have resigned from the board.

A director may be removed for cause by the Governor, upon recommendation of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

3316.

The board may appoint advisory committees. Advisory committees may provide information and advice to the board with respect to the operations and management of the California Exposition and State Fair or such other matters as the board deems appropriate.

The California State Fair Advisory Commission is hereby abolished. Nothing in this part shall, however, prevent the members of the former commission from being appointed to the board or advisory committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

3317.

The two Members of the Legislature who represent the Assembly and Senate district in which the California Exposition and State Fair facilities are located and the chairperson and vice chairperson of the Joint Committee on Fairs Allocation and Classification shall meet with and, except as otherwise provided by the Constitution, advise the board to the extent that such advisory participation is not incompatible with their duties as Members of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administration [3321. - 3322.]

3321.

The board shall appoint, pursuant to Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution, a general manager of the California Exposition and State Fair who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The term of office and duties of the general manager shall be determined by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

3322.

(a) The following officers of the California Exposition and State Fair shall be appointed by the Governor, pursuant to Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution, upon recommendation of the board:

(1) Deputy general manager.

(2) Program manager.

(3) Marketing manager.

(b) The state officers appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall serve at the pleasure of the board, under the direction of the general manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties [3331. - 3334.]

3331.

The board shall serve as the policymaking body for the California Exposition and State Fair and shall have full responsibility for the year-round management and operation of all facilities of the California Exposition and State Fair.

The board shall provide for an annual fair in one or more seasonal divisions in Sacramento County of the industries and industrial products of the state and commercial products exported and imported through the ports of the state. The fair shall be designated the California State Fair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

3332.

The board may do any of the following:

(a) Contract.

(b) Accept funds or gifts of value from the United States or any person to aid in carrying out the purposes of this part.

(c) Conduct or contract for programs, either independently or in cooperation with any individual, public or private organization, or federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(d) Establish and maintain a bank checking account or a savings and loan association account, approved by the Director of Finance in accordance with Sections 16506 and 16605 of the Government Code, for depositing funds received by the California Exposition and State Fair. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all funds maintained in an account authorized by this subdivision are continuously appropriated to the board, without regard to fiscal year, to carry out this part.

(e) Establish a program for paying vendors who contract with the California Exposition and State Fair.

(f) Make or adopt all necessary orders, rules, or regulations for governing the activities of the California Exposition and State Fair. Notwithstanding Section 14, any orders, rules, or regulations adopted by the board are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For informational purposes only, however, any order, rule, or regulation adopted by the board may be transmitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 11343 of the Government Code.

(g) Delegate to the officers and employees of the California Exposition and State Fair the authority to appoint civil service personnel according to state civil service procedures. The board may also delegate to officers and employees of the California Exposition and State Fair the independent authority to appoint marshals and police as authorized by subdivision (j).

(h) Operate a payroll system for paying employees, and a system for accounting for vacation and sick leave credits of employees.

(i) Delegate to the officers and employees of the California Exposition and State Fair the exercise of powers vested in the board as the board may deem desirable for the orderly management and operation of the California Exposition and State Fair.

(j) Appoint all necessary marshals and police to keep order and preserve peace at the California Exposition and State Fair premises on a year-round basis who shall have the powers of peace officers specified in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code. A peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol may be employed as a peace officer while off duty from his or her regular employment, subject to those conditions as may be set forth by the Commissioner of the Department of the California Highway Patrol. At least 75 percent of the persons appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall possess the basic certificate issued by the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training. The remaining 25 percent may be appointed if the person has completed a Peace Officer Standards and Training-certified academy, or possesses a Level One Reserve Certificate (as defined in Section 832.6 of the Penal Code). Of this 25 percent, any portion may be comprised of probation officers certified under Section 832. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to give probation officers appointed pursuant to this subdivision peace officer powers pursuant to Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(k) With the approval of the Department of General Services, purchase, acquire, or hold real or personal property, and beautify or improve that property. Any acquisition of land or other real property is subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, and in the case of the purchase of real property, is subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(l) With the approval of the Department of General Services, make permanent improvements upon publicly owned real property adjacent to, or near the vicinity of, the real property of the California Exposition and State Fair when the improvements materially benefit the property of the California Exposition and State Fair.

(m) Lease, with the approval of the Department of General Services, any of its property for any purpose for any period of time.

(n) Use or manage any of its property, with the approval of the Department of General Services, jointly or in connection with any lessee or sublessee, for any purpose approved by the board.

(o) With the approval of the Department of General Services, pledge any and all revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind, pursuant to such terms and conditions as are approved by the board. Any issuance of bonds, contracts entered into, debts incurred, settlements, judgments, or liens under this section or pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of taxation therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. Any such bond shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect: “Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on this bond.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 825, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3332.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and in accordance with procedures established by the board, the board may enter into agreements to secure donations, memberships, and corporate and individual sponsorships, and may enter into marketing and licensing agreements for the receipt of money, or services or products in lieu of money, and may employ an entity or individual, or create and participate in an entity, or enter into an agreement with an entity or person to develop, solicit, sell, and service these agreements. The compensation for the entity or person shall be established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 423, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

3332.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board is authorized to enter into an agreement for the use of the Cal Expo Lot Z property with the City of Sacramento and the County of Sacramento for a term of five years, provided, however, that in no event shall the California Exposition and State Fair or the State of California be liable for any damages or losses arising directly or indirectly as a result of the use of Cal Expo Lot Z by the City of Sacramento and the County of Sacramento. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall authorize the City of Sacramento and the County of Sacramento to provide on the Cal Expo Lot Z property emergency shelter and other services described in subdivision (b) to individuals experiencing homelessness. The city and the county may contract with a service provider for this purpose.

(b) Emergency shelter and services provided on the Cal Expo Lot Z property may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Full-service, interdisciplinary resources, including mental health and substance abuse programs.

(2) Emergency and interim housing solutions, such as tiny homes, noncongregate shelters, or dormitory style housing, subject to the requirements of Section 8698.4 of the Government Code.

(c) Any agreement for the use of the Cal Expo Lot Z property shall be approved at an open meeting by the City Council of the City of Sacramento and the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento.

(d) (1)   The City of Sacramento and
 the County of Sacramento County shall prioritize the emergency shelter and services provided pursuant to this section in accordance with the following:

(A) First priority shall be given to persons illegally camping in areas of the American River Parkway that have a high risk of fire.

(B) Second priority shall be given to persons illegally camping within sensitive habitat areas of the American River Parkway.

(C) Third priority shall be given to persons illegally camping within other areas of or on lands that are adjacent to the American River Parkway.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “adjacent to” has the same meaning as subdivision (a) of Section 5845.2
 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the Bushy Lake Preservation Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5830) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code) and the Urban American River Parkway Preservation Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5840) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code). When establishing emergency shelter and other services on the Cal Expo Lot Z property, the city and the county shall take the following actions in accordance with the intent of the Bushy Lake Preservation Act and the Urban American River Parkway Preservation Act:

(1) Locating shelter facilities on the portion of the Cal Expo Lot Z property that is as far away as practicable from the sensitive habitat portions of Bushy Lake and is designed to minimize the facility’s
 footprint within the American River Parkway Plan.

(2) Incorporating fencing to discourage, to the extent practical, residents from entering or going to the sensitive Bushy Lake habitat areas.

(3) Incorporating measures to prevent trespassing or unlawful entry into the developed portions of Cal Expo or any other area not associated with Parking Lot Z.

(f) For purposes of this section “Cal Expo Lot Z” means a portion of the real property located at 500 Ethan Way, in the City of Sacramento, consisting of approximately 8.89 acres and commonly known as Cal Expo Lot Z. 

(g) Nothing in this section reduces or waives any requirements to comply with the requirements necessary to qualify for
 state homelessness funding.

(h) For purposes of this section, any agreement is restricted to Lot Z, and not to interfere with the operations taking place within the state’s fairgrounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 255, Sec. 3.   (AB 175)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3332.5.

If the board at any time sends out a request for proposal that could result in an agreement between the board and another party on any matter for a term in excess of 20 years, a copy of that request for proposal shall be sent to the Assembly Committee on Rules and the Senate Committee on Rules at the time at which the request is sent to prospective bidders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.5.   Effective February 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3332.6.

The California Exposition and State Fair may enter into a joint powers agreement with a joint powers authority created pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of planning, designing, and constructing real property improvements, including new construction, alteration, extension, betterment, and repair, and the purchase of fixed and movable equipment. The planning, designing, and constructing of these improvements shall be undertaken in accordance only with those restrictions applicable to the joint powers authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3333.

The board shall submit a report to the Legislature and Governor on or before May 31st of each year with respect to the financial condition, present operations, and future planned activities of the California Exposition and State Fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 825, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3334.

All records of the California Exposition and State Fair for entries in any of its events are public records, except entries in events which are scheduled for future judging or overnight entries in races on which there is parimutuel wagering prior to such events, judging, or races.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. State Fair Leasing Authority [3351. - 3361.]

3351.

(a) There is hereby created the State Fair Leasing Authority, a joint powers authority formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, which shall be composed of the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of Finance, the Department of General Services, and the California Exposition and State Fair.

(b) For the purposes of Section 6502 of the Government Code, the common powers to be exercised by the State Fair Leasing Authority shall be the powers of a district agricultural association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3352.

(a) The authority shall be governed by a board of directors, which shall be composed of the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, the Director of Finance, the Director of General Services, and four individuals, appointed as provided in paragraph (1), who are members of the Board of Directors of the California Exposition and State Fair. The Treasurer and Controller shall be members of the board of the authority only for the purposes of hearing and deciding upon matters related to the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to this chapter. The Director of Finance shall serve as chairperson of the authority. All meetings of the authority shall be open and public.

(1) Of the four appointed members of the Board of Directors of the California Exposition and State Fair, one shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two shall be appointed by the Governor.

(2) The authority may contract with consultants as approved by the board of the authority. The authority shall not employ any other staff.

(3) The general manager of the California Exposition and State Fair may serve only in an advisory capacity to the authority.

(b) The authority is a “department” for the purposes of hearings pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3353.

(a) The California Exposition and State Fair shall provide clerical services and the use of its staff without charge to the authority. The Department of Finance, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of General Services, and the California Horse Racing Board shall cooperate with the authority, and, upon request of the chairperson of the authority, shall provide the authority with the reasonable and periodic use of their staffs.

(b) The Attorney General shall serve as counsel for, and adviser to, the authority, and shall approve outside counsel to the authority in furtherance of the provisions of this chapter, as requested by the chairperson of the authority.

(c) The costs, if any, for services to the authority specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be paid for by the authority, with funds generated pursuant to this chapter. Any costs in excess of the funds available to the authority shall be paid by the California Exposition and State Fair.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3354.

The authority may enter into leases or other agreements for the use of the State Fair Race Track or any other property owned or controlled by the California Exposition and State Fair which are necessary to further the purposes of Section 3331 or to provide horse racing at the State Fair Race Track. A lease or agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be on behalf of the California Exposition and State Fair, and the State Fair shall continue in control of its property, subject to the conditions and terms of that lease or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3355.

The California Exposition and State Fair, in consultation with the authority, shall prepare a master plan approved by the board of directors of the fair for the long-range comprehensive development and improvement of, and construction upon, the property of the California Exposition and State Fair. The plan shall prescribe the amounts which may be expended for the various features of the plan, the period authorized for the completion of each project, and the terms of any revenue bond financing undertaken with respect to the plan. The plan shall require that any revenue bond financing shall be rated in one of the four highest rating categories by two nationally recognized rating agencies. Upon its completion, the master plan shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review. The master plan is subject to amendment by the authority, with the approval of the Board of Directors of the California State Fair.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3356.

The California Horse Racing Board, at the request of the authority, shall certify the eligibility of any prospective lessee or user of the property to be licensed to conduct horse racing at the State Fair Race Track.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3357.

(a) In leasing, or entering into agreements for the use of, the State Fair Race Track or other property owned or controlled by the California Exposition and State Fair, the authority shall follow the same procedures, as appropriate, as the Department of General Services follows in leasing or entering into similar agreements for other state real property. The authority shall also consult with, and present for comment the lease or agreement to, the governing bodies of the City and County of Sacramento prior to awarding the lease or entering into the agreement.

(b) Prior to awarding a lease of, or entering into an agreement for the use of, the State Fair Race Track or other property owned or controlled by the California Exposition and State Fair, the authority shall consider all the factors concerning appropriate capital improvements of the race track, the financing of the race track, additional racing opportunities, and the use of new or additional properties or facilities, including, but not limited to, a grandstand or grandstand improvements, which factors shall be considered in the award of the lease or entering into the agreement. The authority shall also consult with, and present for comment the lease or agreement to, the governing bodies of the City and County of Sacramento prior to awarding the lease or entering into the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3358.

If the authority makes a determination pursuant to this chapter about an action it proposes to take in awarding the State Fair Race Track lease or entering into the agreement, it shall report to the Legislature, setting forth the procedures followed by the authority in reaching its determination and the reasons the proposed award or agreement is in the best interests of the state. The authority shall also make recommendations regarding any additional legislation which it deems necessary. However, no legislative action is required to make a lease or agreement entered into by the authority effective and operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3359.

After the award of a lease or upon entering into an agreement for the use of State Fair property, the authority shall meet periodically to review the operation of the lease or agreement, and the master plan, and to consider any other related matters. It shall also make any recommendations that it deems proper to the Legislature, other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the California Exposition and State Fair, and to the lessee or user of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3360.

(a) The authority, in the exercise of its powers, may pledge any and all revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of any kind, pursuant to the terms and conditions approved by the authority. The revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment pledged by the authority or its assignees constitute a lien and security interest which immediately attaches to the property so pledged, and is effective, binding, and enforceable against the authority, its successors, purchasers of the property so pledged, creditors, and all others asserting rights therein, to the extent set forth, and in accordance with, the terms and conditions of the pledge, irrespective of whether those persons have notice of the pledge and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act.

(b) The California Exposition and State Fair shall be responsible for any debt incurred pursuant to this chapter, and the capital of the California Exposition and State Fair shall be used to guarantee any indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3361.

The State of California pledges to, and agrees with, the holders of any bonds, other indebtedness, or obligations for the financing of the improvements described in the master plan pursuant to Section 3355, and which are issued or executed and delivered by the authority, or the California Exposition and State Fair, that the state will not alter or change the structure of funding of, and deposits to, the authority or to the California Exposition and State Fair pursuant to the provisions of Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, or the pledge of funds for debt service, security, including any coverage factors, and expenses entered into pursuant to this chapter until the bonds, other indebtedness, or obligations are fully paid or discharged or have been fully provided for in accordance with their terms. However, nothing precludes any alteration or change if and when adequate provision has been made by law for the protection from impairment of the contract represented by the bonds, other indebtedness, or obligations, and the right to alter or change is hereby reserved. The authority, and the California Exposition and State Fair, are each authorized to include this pledge and undertaking of the state in their bonds, agreements evidencing other indebtedness, and other indebtedness or obligations for the financing of the improvements described in the master plan pursuant to Section 3355.

 The authority shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at least 90 days prior to authorizing the sale of revenue bonds pursuant to this chapter. The notice shall specify all the terms and conditions of the revenue bonds, including, but not limited to, the total amount of the bonds, the revenue source, and the repayment period. Any bond so issued shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect: “Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on, this bond.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. DISTRICT AGRICULTURAL ASSOCIATIONS [3801. - 4363.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [3801. - 3806.]

3801.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3802.

“Association” means a district agricultural association which is formed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3803.

“Board” means the board of directors of an association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3804.

“Director” means a member of the board of directors of an association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3805.

“District” means an agricultural district which is formed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3806.

For the purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 4101) of Chapter 6 of this part, “agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 98.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Organization and Administration [3951. - 3968.]

3951.

Fifty or more persons, who are residents of a district, may form an association to be known as and designated as the ____ District Agricultural Association, for the following purposes:

(a) Holding fairs, expositions and exhibitions for the purpose of exhibiting all of the industries and industrial enterprises, resources and products of every kind or nature of the state with a view toward improving, exploiting, encouraging, and stimulating them.

(b) Constructing, maintaining, and operating recreational and cultural facilities of general public interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3952.

Copies of the articles of association shall be filed with the Governor, the Secretary of State, and the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3953.

Each association is a state institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3954.

Each association by its name has perpetual succession. It may have a seal. An association may sue and be sued, and may do any and all things necessary to carry out the powers and the objects and purposes for which the association is formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3955.

Claims against an association shall be presented to the Department of General Services in accordance with Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 29.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3956.

(a) The officers of the association shall consist of a board of directors of nine members. The directors shall be citizens and residents of the district.

(b) (1) A director shall not officially be seated on the board or participate in a board meeting until they have completed any mandatory forms and training, as required by state law and as determined by the department.

(2) A director shall, on a timely basis, complete any form or training that becomes mandatory during their term
 of office, retake any mandatory training that is required to be repeated periodically, and continue to submit any required forms during their term of office. The relevant form or training shall be completed by the director within 90 days of the form or training requirement or the expiration of the effective period of the form or training. A director shall be subject to removal from the board if they do not comply with these requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 374, Sec. 2.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3957.

If two or more counties constitute a district, each county shall be represented on the board by at least two persons who are citizens and residents of such county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3958.

If, by reason of the formation of a new district, a director in one district becomes a resident of another district, his term of office as director expires 60 days after the formation of the new district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3959.

The directors shall be appointed by the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3960.

The term of office of each director, except that of a member of the first board, is four years from the beginning of the term for which he or she is appointed. Any vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term. However, any director may be removed for cause by the Governor prior to the expiration of the director’s term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3961.

The term of office of each member of the first board shall be so fixed by the Governor that the terms of the directors of such board shall expire in three groups of two, and one group of three, on the 15th day of January of each year following the formation of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3962.

The directors are state officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3963.

The directors shall meet at a place within the district and organize by the election of one of their number as president. The term of office of the president shall be one year and until his successor is elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3964.

The directors shall also select a secretary, a manager, and a treasurer from among persons who are not members of the board. One person may be the secretary, the manager, and the treasurer. The secretary, manager, and treasurer are state officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective March 23, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

3964.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a board may form any advisory committee by resolution or any similar formal action.

(b) Meetings of an advisory committee shall be open and public and notice thereof shall be delivered personally or by mail at least 24 hours before the time of the meeting to each person who has requested, in writing, notice of the meeting.

(c) If the advisory committee elects to provide for the holding of regular meetings, it shall provide in its bylaws, or by whatever other rule is utilized by the board for the conduct of its business, for the time and place for holding regular meetings. No other notice of regular meetings is required.

(d) “Advisory committee”, as used in this section, means a committee composed solely of the members of the board which is less than a quorum of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3965.

The board may, with the approval of the department:

(a) Fix the term of office, the amount of bond and salary, and prescribe the duties of the secretary and of the treasurer.

(b) Manage the affairs of the association.

(c) Make all necessary bylaws, rules, and regulations for the government of the association.

(d) Delegate, as it may deem advisable, to its officers or employees any of the powers that are vested in the board under subdivision (b). Any delegation of power may be revoked at any
 time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 342, Sec. 3.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3965.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3965 or 4051, the board, without prior approval from the department, may arrange for and conduct, or cause to be conducted, or by contract permit to be conducted, any activity by any individual, institution, corporation, or association upon its property at a time as it may be deemed advisable, except for the following:

(1) Revenue-generating contracts involving hazardous activities, as determined by the department, unless adequate insurance coverage is provided, as determined by the department in consultation with the Department of General Services.

(2) The activities specified in Section
 4051.2 and Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall not be construed and is not intended to extend or limit the authority specified in Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 342, Sec. 4.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3966.

The board shall annually make to the department such report as such department may direct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3967.

Any director who misses three consecutive regular meetings of the board without the permission of the board is deemed to have resigned as a director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

3968.

Records of the board which are entries in events which are scheduled for future judging and for overnight entries in races on which there is parimutuel wagering prior to such events, judging times, or races, shall not be open to inspection by the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Fiscal Provisions [4001. - 4005.]

4001.

Any money which is received by any association, other than from the sale of real property or pursuant to a lease, easement, or agreement for the extraction of oil or gas from lands owned or controlled by it, shall be retained and used by the association for its:

(a) General use and purposes.

(b) Maintenance.

(c) Membership in livestock registry associations and fair associations.

(d) Support and operation.

(e) Acquisition, installation, maintenance, and operation of recreational and cultural facilities at its fairgrounds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.
